Utah statutes.
63C-4-105.   Policy for public lands within the state.

(1)  It is the policy of the state to claim and preserve by lawful means the rights of the state and its citizens to determine and affect the disposition and use of federal lands within the state as those rights are granted by the United States Constitution, the Utah Enabling Act, and other applicable law.

(2)  The Constitutional Defense Council shall study, formulate, and recommend appropriate legal strategies and arguments to further this policy.



Enacted by Chapter 287, 2001 General Session

